Tables/Contraction/de-wort.cti
# Doppelvokale
always cherokee 1456-12456-135-13-15-15
always dekolletee 145-15-13-135-12345-15-2345-15-15
always ackerbeer 1-46-12456-12-15-15-1235
always apfelbeer 1-1234-124-13456-12-15-15-1235
always beerenart 12-15-15-1235-14-356-2345
always beerenförmig 12-15-15-1235-14-124-246-1235-134-45
always bickbeer 12-24-46-12-15-15-1235
always blaubeer 12-123-16-12-15-15-1235
always blutbeer =
always bockbeer 12-135-46-12-15-15-1235
always brombeer =
always boysenbeer 12-135-6-13456-234-14-12-15-15-1235
always erdbeer 12456-145-12-15-15-1235
always essigbeer 15-2346-45-12-15-15-1235
always felsenbeer 124-13456-234-14-12-15-15-1235
always fliederbeer 124-123-346-145-12456-12-15-15-1235
always gewürzbeer 12346-2456-1256-1235-1356-12-15-15-1235
always giftbeer =
always heidelbeer 125-146-145-13456-12-15-15-1235
always himbeer =
always holunderbeer 125-135-123-256-145-12456-12-15-15-1235
always johannisbeer 245-135-125-235-1345-24-234-12-15-15-1235
always kermesbeer 13-12456-134-123456-12-15-15-1235
always korallenbeer 13-135-1235-1-12345-14-12-15-15-1235
always krähenbeer 13-1235-345-125-14-12-15-15-1235
always lorbeer 123-26-12-15-15-1235
always maibeer =
always maulbeer 134-16-123-12-15-15-1235
always mehlbeer 134-2356-123-12-15-15-1235
always moorbeer =
always moosbeer =
always nachtbeer 1345-56-2345-12-15-15-1235
always nagelbeer 1345-1-1245-13456-12-15-15-1235
always nebelbeer 1345-15-12-13456-12-15-15-1235
always panzerbeer 1234-235-1356-12456-12-15-15-1235
always pfefferbeer 1234-124-15-124-124-12456-12-15-15-1235
always pimentbeer 1234-24-134-14-2345-12-15-15-1235
always preiselbeer 1234-1235-146-234-13456-12-15-15-1235
always sandbeer 234-235-145-12-15-15-1235
always schneebeer 156-1345-15-15-12-15-15-1235
always schwarzbeer 156-2456-356-1356-12-15-15-1235
always stachelbeer 23456-56-13456-12-15-15-1235
always stechbeer 23456-15-1456-12-15-15-1235
always steinbeer 23456-1246-12-15-15-1235
always sumpfbeer =
always vogelbeer 1236-135-1245-13456-12-15-15-1235
always wacholderbeer 2456-56-135-123-145-12456-12-15-15-1235
always waldbeer 2456-25-145-12-15-15-1235
always weinbeer 2456-1246-12-15-15-1235
always weißbeer 2456-146-6-2346-12-15-15-1235
always winterbeer 2456-35-2345-12456-12-15-15-1235
always wolfsbeer =
always wunderbeer 2456-256-145-12456-12-15-15-1235
always zwergerdbeer 1356-2456-12456-1245-12456-145-12-15-15-1235
always zwieselbeer 1356-2456-346-234-13456-12-15-15-1235
always frisbee 124-1235-24-234-12-15-15
before e always galeer 1245-25-15-15-1235
always haar =
always heer =
always leer =
always kaffee =
always coffee 6-14-135-124-124-15-15
always toffee 2345-135-124-124-15-15
always dragee =
always bungee 12-256-1245-15-15
always dorothee 145-26-135-2345-125-15-15
always cheese 1456-15-15-234-15
always paneel 1234-235-15-15-123
always pappmaschee 1234-1-1234-1234-134-1-156-15-15
always klischee 13-123-24-156-15-15
always yankee 6-13456-235-13-15-15
sufword teenie 2345-15-15-1345-346
sufword teenager 2345-15-15-1345-1-1245-12456
always gelee 1245-13456-15-15
prfword geleerte 12346-123-15-15-1235-236
always geleert 12346-123-15-15-1235-2345

always soufflee =
always defilee 145-15-124-24-123-15-15
always klee =
begword tee =
always renommee 1235-14-135-1346-15-15
always armee 356-134-15-15
always resümee 1235-123456-1256-134-15-15
always schnee 156-1345-15-15
always trainee 2345-1235-1-24-1345-15-15
always pralinee 1234-1235-1-123-35-15-15
always portmonee 1234-26-2345-134-135-1345-15-15
always kanapee 13-235-1-1234-15-15
always portepee 1234-26-236-1234-15-15
always separee 234-15-1234-356-15-15
always referee 1235-15-124-12456-15-15
always schikoree 156-24-13-26-15-15
always spree 234-1234-1235-15-15
always karree 13-356-1235-15-15
always porree 1234-26-1235-15-15
always püree 1234-1256-1235-15-15
always frikassee 124-1235-24-13-1-2346-15-15
always plissee 1234-123-24-2346-15-15
always varietee 1236-356-24-15-2345-15-15
always komitee =
always trustee 2345-1235-136-23456-15-15
always frottee 124-1235-135-2345-2345-15-15
always queen =
always halloween 125-1-12345-135-2456-15-15-1345

always hawaii =
always ascii =

always boom =
always voodoo =
always yahoo =
always waterloo 2456-1-2345-12456-123-135-135
always shampoo =
always tattoo =
always daewoo =
always zoo =

sufword teer =
sufword geteer 12346-2345-15-15-1235
prfword teer =
prfword teeren 2345-15-15-1235-14
prfword teers =
always teergeschmack 2345-15-15-1235-12346-156-134-1-46

always birkenmoor 12-24-1235-13-14-134-135-135-1235
always buschmoor 12-136-156-134-135-135-1235
always ekelmoor 15-13-13456-134-135-135-1235
always flachmoor 124-123-56-134-135-135-1235
always galgenmoor 1245-25-1245-14-134-135-135-1235
always grasmoor =
always hangmoor 125-235-1245-134-135-135-1235
always heidemoor 125-146-145-15-134-135-135-1235 shouldn't use the dem-contraction

before t always züch 1356-1256-1456

always käse 13-345-234-15
always käserei 13-345-234-12456-146
always käsereib 13-345-234-15-1235-146-12
always käsereibetrie 13-345-234-12456-146-23-2345-1235-346
always käsereifen 13-345-234-15-1235-146-124-14
always käsereifung 13-345-234-15-1235-146-124-136
prfword käsen 13-345-234-14
prfword käses 13-345-234-123456

always niveau 1345-24-1236-15-16
always plateau 1234-123-1-2345-15-16

always busschaffner 12-136-234-156-1-124-124-1345-12456
before t always busschnit 12-136-234-156-1345-24-2345
prfword bussektor =
always bussektor 12-136-234-234-15-13-2345-26
always bussteuer 12-136-234-23456-126-12456
always busstreck 12-136-234-23456-1235-15-46
always bussystem 12-136-234-234-6-13456-23456-12356

always reisehafen 1235-146-234-15-125-1-124-14
always reisehäfen 1235-146-234-15-125-345-124-14
always reiseland 1235-146-234-15-123-235-145 shouldn't use the el-contraction
always reiseländer 1235-146-234-15-123-345-1345-145-12456 shouldn't use the el-contraction
before e always autoreis 16-2345-135-1235-146-234
always autorennbahn 16-2345-135-1235-14-1345-12-1-125-1345
word autorennen 16-2345-135-1235-14-1345-14
word autorennens 16-2345-135-1235-14-1345-14-234
always autorennfahr 16-2345-135-1235-14-1345-2-1235
always reisespezialist 1235-146-234-15-234-1234-15-1356-24-25-24-23456
before hilmnrsu always service 234-12456-1236-24-6-14-15
prfword services 234-12456-1236-24-6-14-123456
before t always reiserou 1235-146-234-15-1235-135-136
before t always reisemona 1235-146-234-15-134-135-1345-1
always reisesaison 1235-146-234-15-234-1-24-234-135-1345 shouldn't use the es-contraction
before e always rundreis 1235-256-145-1235-146-234

before hilmnrsu begword lade =
word laden 123-1-145-14
sufword ladenadress 123-1-145-14-1-145-1235-15-2346
sufword ladenangebo 123-1-145-14-235-12346-12-135
sufword ladenanschlag 123-1-145-14-235-156-1245
sufword ladenartikel 123-1-145-14-356-2345-24-13-13456
sufword ladenatelier 123-1-145-14-1-2345-13456-24-12456
sufword ladenauf 123-1-145-14-2-16
sufword ladenaus 123-1-145-14-16-234
sufword ladeneigen 123-1-145-14-146-1245-14
sufword ladenein 123-1-145-14-1246
sufword ladeneröffn 123-1-145-14-12456-246-124-124-1345
sufword ladeninhab 123-1-145-14-35-2-125
sufword ladeninvent 123-1-145-14-35-1236-14-2345
sufword ladenöffn 123-1-145-14-246-124-124-1345
sufword ladenumbau 123-1-145-14-136-134-12-16
word lader 123-1-145-12456
word ladern 123-1-145-12456-1345
word laders 123-1-145-12456-234


before konsonant begword laden 123-1-145-14

before hilmnrsu begword lese 123-123456-15
word lesen 123-123456-14
sufword lesend 123-123456-14-145
sufword lesens 123-123456-14-234
word leser 123-123456-12456
sufword leseranaly 123-123456-12456-235-25-6-13456
before g begword leseranfra 123-123456-12456-235-124-1235-1
sufword leseranteil 123-123456-12456-235-2345-146-123
sufword leserartikel 123-123456-12456-356-2345-24-13-13456
word leserei 123-123456-12456-146
sufword lesereinbind 123-123456-12456-1246-12-35-145
sufword leserempfehl 123-123456-12456-12356-1234-124-2356-123
sufword lesererwart 123-123456-12456-12456-2456-356-2345
word leserin 123-123456-12456-35
sufword leserinnen 123-123456-12456-35-1356-14
sufword leserinteress 123-123456-12456-2-35
sufword leserorientier 123-123456-12456-26-24-14-2345-346-1235
before e sufword leserumfra 123-123456-12456-136-134-124-1235-1
before konsonant begword leser 123-123456-12456

before hilmnrsu begword reise 1235-146-234-15
word reisen 1235-146-234-14
sufword reisend 1235-146-234-14-145
word reisens 1235-146-234-14-234
before t sufword reisern 1235-146-234-12456-1345
word reises 1235-146-234-123456
before cost sufword reis 1235-146-234

always avantgarde 1-1236-235-2345-1245-356-145-15
always firmware 124-24-1235-134-2456-356-15
always hardcore 125-356-145-6-14-26-15
always hardware 125-356-145-2456-356-15
always lactose =
always renaissance 1235-14-1-24-2346-235-6-14-15
always software 234-135-124-2345-2456-356-15

before cost always kreis 13-1235-146-234
before cost always praxis =
before cost always preis 1234-1235-146-234

always reimplant 1235-15-24-134-1234-123-235-2345
always reimplement 1235-15-24-134-1234-123-15-134-14-2345
before t always reimpor 1235-15-24-134-1234-26
always reindustrialis 1235-15-35-145-136-23456-1235-24-25-24-234
always reinfizier 1235-15-35-124-24-1356-346-1235
always reinitialis 1235-15-35-24-2345-24-25-24-234
always reinkarn 1235-15-35-13-356-1345
always reinstall 1235-15-35-23456-1-12345
always reinszenier 1235-15-35-234-1356-14-346-1235
always reintegr 1235-15-35-236-1245-1235
always reinterpret 1235-15-35-2345-12456-1234-1235-15-2345
always remineralis 1235-15-134-35-12456-25-24-234
always reunion 1235-15-256-24-135-1345
always reuelos 1235-126-15-123-135-234

always abgeordneten 1-12-12346-26-145-1345-15-2345-14
always abiturienten 1-12-24-2345-136-1235-24-14-2345-14
always abonnenten 1-12-135-1345-1345-14-2345-14
always adressaten 1-145-1235-15-2346-1-2345-14
always studenten 23456-136-145-14-2345-14

always tereignis 2345-12456-146-1245-1346

sufword regen 1235-15-1245-14

before cost always alltags 1-12345-2345-1-1245-234
before cost always ausgangs 16-234-1245-235-1245-234
before cost always betriebs 23-2345-1235-346-12-234
prfword betriebst 23-2345-1235-346-12-23456
before cost always bezirks 23-1356-24-1235-13-234
before cost always drillings 145-1235-24-12345-35-1245-234
before cost always eingangs 1246-1245-235-1245-234
before cost always funktions 124-256-13-2345-24-135-1345-234
before cost always gesangs 12346-234-235-1245-234
before cost always gesundheits 12346-234-256-145-125-234
before cost always jahres 245-1235-123456
before cost always realitäts 1235-15-25-5-345-234
before cost always sicherheits 234-3456-12456-125-234
before cost always vorstands 2-26-2-23456-234
